Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.010

Scope and construction of terms.

Terms used in this title shall have the meaning given to them in this chapter except where otherwise defined, and unless where used the context thereof shall clearly indicate to the contrary.

Words and phrases used herein in the past, present or future tense shall include the past, present and future tenses; words and phrases used herein in the masculine, feminine or neuter gender shall include the masculine, feminine and neuter genders; and words and phrases used herein in the singular or plural shall include the singular and plural; unless the context thereof shall indicate to the contrary.

[ 1961 c 12 s 46.04.010. Prior: 1959 c 49 s 2; prior: (i) 1943 c 153 s 1, part; 1937 c 188 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6312-1, part; 1923 c 181 s 1, part; 1921 c 96 s 2, part; 1919 c 59 s 1, part; 1917 c 155 s 1, part; 1915 c 142 s 2, part; RRS s 6313, part. (ii) 1937 c 189 s 1, part; RRS s 6360-1, part; 1929 c 180 s 1, part; 1927 c 309 s 2, part; RRS s 6362-2, part.]